Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

General Provisions

2-11-101. Composition of commission.

The state election commission shall be composed of seven (7) members.

Wherever in this code the board of elections of the state is referred to, the term “state election commission” shall be substituted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, §§ 1, 6; 1975, ch. 72, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 2-1101; Acts 2011, ch. 125, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The state election commission is attached to the department of state for all administrative matters although the autonomy of the commission and its authority are not affected. See §4-3-2103.

The state election commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2011, ch. 125, § 5 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the act, which amended subsection (a), not increase the amount appropriated for compensation and travel expenses due to the increase in members serving on the commission. Each member shall receive compensation and travel expenses in accordance with §§2-11-107 and2-11-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 8.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §2-1-112(a) would not prohibit a city or county elected official from serving on the state election commission, OAG 02-117 (10/22/02).

T.C.A. §2-1-112(a) prohibits a candidate for election or reelection to a county or city office or for election to any other state or local office from serving as a member of the state election commission, OAG 02-117 (10/22/02).

Tenn. Const. art. II, § 26 would not prohibit the same individual from serving on the state election commission and holding a local elective office at the same time, OAG 02-117 (10/22/02).

Conflicts of interest involving state and county election commissions, OAG 06-159 (10/9/06).

2-11-102. Qualifications of members.

Each member of the state election commission shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age and shall have been a resident of the state for at least seven (7) years prior to such member's election. No more than two (2) members shall be from the same grand division, and each member shall have been a resident of the grand division such member represents for at least four (4) years preceding such member's election; provided, however, that if two (2) additional members are added pursuant to § 2-11-112, then no more than three (3) members shall be from the same grand division.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 72, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-1102; Acts 2009, ch. 376, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 376, § 3 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the act, which amended §2-11-102 and added §2-11-112, not increase the amount appropriated for compensation and travel expenses due to the increase in members temporarily serving on the commission. Each member shall receive travel expenses in accordance with §2-11-108 and any remaining amount shall be divided equally among all members as compensation in accordance with §2-11-107.

Cross-References. Age discrimination in appointments to state boards and commissions prohibited, §4-1-403.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 8.

2-11-103. Political composition of commission — Nominations.

Four (4) members of the commission shall be members of the majority party, and three (3) members of the commission shall be members of the minority party.

Each member to be elected shall first be nominated by a joint senate-house caucus of the members of the party of which such person is a member.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 72, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-1103; Acts 2011, ch. 125, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 125, § 5 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the act, which amended subsection (a), not increase the amount appropriated for compensation and travel expenses due to the increase in members serving on the commission. Each member shall receive compensation and travel expenses in accordance with §§2-11-107 and2-11-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 8.

2-11-104. Election of members.

All members shall be elected for a term of four (4) years, beginning on the first Monday in May 1979.

The election of the members of the state election commission shall be by joint resolution of both houses of the general assembly. The election is to take place in the joint session of both houses in which each member of the general assembly shall be entitled to one (1) vote.

Elections shall be held on any date fixed by joint resolution, but shall be held prior to the fourth Monday in March of the year of the election.

Nomination of members shall be in accordance with § 2-11-103.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 642, § 3; 1975, ch. 72, § 6; 1976, ch. 659, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 8.

2-11-105. Vacancies.

Any person chosen to fill a vacancy shall be a bona fide member of the same party as the person such person replaces.

If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the state election commission at the time when the general assembly is in session, the vacancy may be filled by the general assembly in the same manner as full terms are. A person elected to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term of the member whose place such person fills.

If a vacancy occurs at a time when the general assembly is not in session, the vacancy shall be filled by the remaining members of the commission. If the remaining members of the commission are not able to agree on a successor to fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days of the time when such vacancy occurs, the secretary of state, the comptroller of the treasury, and the state treasurer, or a majority of those officers shall fill the vacancy. Persons selected to fill vacancies under this subsection (c) shall serve only until the next session of the general assembly, when the general assembly shall fill the vacancies as if they had occurred when the general assembly was in session.

If the general assembly adjourns without filling any vacancies, vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as if they had occurred when the general assembly was not in session.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1105.

2-11-106. Qualification and organization.

The members shall qualify within fifteen (15) days after their election and organize by the selection of one (1) member as chair and another as secretary.

The chair and secretary shall be elected for terms of one (1) year and shall be members of different political parties.

Failure on the part of a member to qualify by taking the oath shall vacate the election of such member.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-1106.

2-11-107. Compensation of members.

Each member of the state election commission shall receive as compensation such sum as the general assembly may appropriate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1107.

2-11-108. Expenses.

The state election commission shall be allowed the necessary sum per annum, payable out of the state treasury, for stationery, postage, and expenses incidental to the conduct of the business of the commission, which shall be payable upon vouchers signed by the secretary and countersigned by the chair of the commission.

The members shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel expense incurred in the performance of their official duties in conformity with comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (24); 1978, ch. 754, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-1108.

Compiler's Notes. The state election commission is attached to the department of state for all administrative matters including expense accounts. See §4-3-2103.

2-11-109. Meetings.

All meetings of the state election commission shall be held in the city of Nashville and at a place selected by the commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 321, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1109.

2-11-110. Ex officio, nonvoting members.

The chair of the state primary board of any statewide political party which has no members on the state election commission shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the state election commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-1110.

2-11-111. Members prohibited from serving as political candidate's campaign manager or treasurer.

No member of the state election commission who is appointed to the commission after January 1, 2009, shall be the campaign manager or treasurer of any candidate's political campaign in a local, state or federal election during the commissioner's term of office. A violation of this section subjects the member to immediate removal from office by a majority vote of the other members of the state election commission. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a member of the state election commission from providing uncompensated advice on a one-on-one basis to a candidate or party officer, nor shall it prohibit providing a financial contribution to a candidate or party organization.

Acts 2008, ch. 1051, § 2.

Cross-References. County election commissioners prohibited from serving as political candidate's campaign manager or treasurer, §2-1-112.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of restriction on political activity of election commissioners, OAG 07-023 (3/1/07).

2-11-112. Additional members from majority party added to commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if the majority party, as defined in §2-1-104, changes as a result of the 2008 regular November election, then two (2) additional members from the majority party shall be added to the commission. The additional members shall meet the same qualifications and shall be appointed and elected in the same manner as other members of the commission.

Acts 2009, ch. 376, § 1; 2011, ch. 125, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 376, § 3 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the act, which amended §2-11-102 and added §2-11-112, not increase the amount appropriated for compensation and travel expenses due to the increase in members temporarily serving on the commission. Each member shall receive travel expenses in accordance with §2-11-108 and any remaining amount shall be divided equally among all members as compensation in accordance with §2-11-107.

Acts 2011, ch. 125, § 5 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the act, which amended this section not increase the amount appropriated for compensation and travel expenses due to the increase in members serving on the commission. Each member shall receive compensation and travel expenses in accordance with §§2-11-107 and2-11-108.

2-11-113. Removal of member by general assembly.

The general assembly, by joint resolution, may remove a member of the state election commission for cause and may remove a member who becomes unqualified.

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 9. October 1, 2019.